New York, session 2025-2026, A5451.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2 of chapter 459 of the laws of 2022 amending the 2 tax law relating to authorizing an occupancy tax in the village of High- 3 land Falls, is amended to read as follows: 4 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 5 deemed repealed December 31, [2025] 2027. 6 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02222-01-5